Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-724.1 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each hospital licensed by the State Department of Health


shall develop, implement, and enforce a written policy for the


billing of hospital services and supplies. The policy shall


include:


1. A periodic review of the itemized statements required by


subsection B of this section; and



Req. No. 177 Page 1


2. A procedure for handling complaints relating to billed


services.


B. Not later than thirty (30) business days after the date of


the hospital discharge of a person who received hospital services,


the hospital shall automatically provide an itemized statement of


the billed services provided to the person. The itemized statement


shall be printed in a conspicuous manner and shall list the


following information:


1. Provider’s name and National Provider Identifier (NPI)


number;


2. Date or dates of service;


3. Admission date;


4. Discharge date;


5. Revenue codes corresponding to each service rendered;


6. Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) or Healthcare Common


Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) codes corresponding to each service


rendered;


7. Description of each service;


8. Amount charged by the provider for each service;


9. Units and quantities of each service provided, specifically


procedures, tests, or medications that may be measured in units;


10. Subtotal of each service;


11. Insurance payments;


12. Patient payments;

Req. No. 177 Page 2


13. Payment due date;


14. Provider’s contact information; and


15. A section on hospital payments and adjustments, which shall


include:


a. date or dates of service,


b. description of hospital payment and adjustment,


c. any discounts and credits,


d. total hospital payment and adjustments, and


e. final hospital payment after adjustments.


C. A hospital shall provide an itemized statement of billed


services to a third-party payor who is actually or potentially


responsible for paying all or part of the billed services provided


to a patient and who has received a claim for payment of those


services. To be entitled to receive a statement, the third-party


payor must request the statement from the hospital and must have


received a claim for payment. The request must be made not later


than one year after the date on which the payor received the claim


for payment. The hospital shall provide the statement to the payor


not later than thirty (30) business days after the date on which the


payor requests the statement. If a third-party payor receives a


claim for payment of part but not all of the billed services, the


third-party payor may request an itemized statement of only the


billed services for which payment is claimed or to which any


deduction or copayment applies. If a third-party payor requests

Req. No. 177 Page 3


more than two copies of the statement, the hospital may charge a


reasonable fee for the third and subsequent copies provided to that


person. The fee shall not exceed the hospital’s cost to copy,


process, and deliver the copy to the person.


D. The State Department of Health may enforce this section by


assessing an administrative penalty, obtaining an injunction, or


providing any other appropriate remedy, including suspending,


revoking, or refusing to renew a hospital’s license.


E. As used in this section, “hospital” has the same meaning as


provided by Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. This section shall not apply to a hospital maintained or


operated by the federal government.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-177 DC 1/16/2025 2:19:56 PM



















Req. No. 177 Page 4